Hawaii statutes.
§107-25 Hawaii state building codes;
requirements. There is established the Hawaii state building codes
applicable to all construction in the State of Hawaii. The Hawaii state
building codes shall be based upon:

(1) The state fire code as adopted by the state fire
council;

(2) The Uniform Plumbing Code, as copyrighted and
published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical
Officials, including its appendices;

(3) The International Building Code, the
International Residential Code, and the International Energy Conservation Code,
as published by the International Code Council;

(4) The National Electrical Code, as published by the
National Fire Protection Association;

(5) Hawaii design standards implementing the criteria
pursuant to Act 5, Special Session Laws of Hawaii, 2005, as applicable to:

(A) Emergency shelters built to comply with
hurricane resistant criteria, including enhanced hurricane protection areas
capable of withstanding a five hundred-year hurricane event as well as other
storms and natural hazards; and

(B) Essential government facilities requiring
continuity of operations; and

(6) Code provisions based on nationally published
codes or standards that include but are not limited to residential and
hurricane resistant standards related to loss mitigation standards in
accordance with section 431P-12, elevator, mechanical, flood and tsunami,
existing buildings, and onsite sewage disposal. [L 2007, c 82, pt of §2; am L
2014, c 164, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next